Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-805
Debauching a minor; penalty.

(1) Any person not a minor commits the offense of debauching a minor if he or she shall debauch or deprave the morals of any boy or girl under the age of seventeen years by:

(a) Lewdly inducing such boy or girl carnally to know any other person; or

(b) Soliciting any such boy or girl to visit a house of prostitution or other place where prostitution, debauchery, or other immoral practices are permitted or encouraged, for the purpose of prostitution or sexual penetration; or

(c) Arranging or assisting in arranging any meeting for such purpose between any such boy or girl and any female or male of dissolute character or any inmate of any place where prostitution, debauchery, or other immoral practices are permitted or encouraged; or

(d) Arranging or aiding or assisting in arranging any meeting between any such boy or girl and any other person for the purpose of sexual penetration.

(2) Debauching a minor is a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 161;

Laws 1979, LB 378, § 12.

Registration of sex offenders, see sections 29-4001 to 29-4014.

Debauching a minor is not a lesser-included offense of pandering. Mingus v. Fairbanks, 211 Neb. 81, 317 N.W.2d 770 (1982).

The words "any other person" are construed to mean any person other than the victim. State v. Parmer, 210 Neb. 92, 313 N.W.2d 237 (1981).